Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1597.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1529. After-school Reading Program.--(a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year and continuing with each school year thereafter, a school entity may establish an after-school or summer-peer tutoring program that employs teen leaders from the school entity's community to deliver one-to-one structured literacy tutoring and uses an evidence-based phonics curriculum to students enrolled in kindergarten through grade two at the school entity to help improve reading proficiency.(b) A school entity may collaborate with businesses, 1234567891011121314151617181920 educational organizations and other nonprofit organizations to establish the program.(c) Not later than December 31, 2025, the department shall develop guidance for school entities to establish a program under this section. The guidance shall include a model curriculum and training modules.(d) A program under this section shall be based on the following principles:(1) The program shall employ one-to-one tutoring using an evidence-based phonics curriculum.(2) Teen leaders shall be trained as individual literacy tutors using leveled books and decoding strategies from the evidence-based phonics curriculum.(3) Teachers participating in the program shall be trained in the evidence-based phonics curriculum and assessment tools.(4) The program shall be conducted after school or during the summer for three (3) to four (4) days per week for forty-five (45) sessions.(5) Each tutoring session shall be for ninety (90) minutes. During a session, each student shall receive forty-five (45) minutes of one-to-one tutoring and support in foundational reading skills and forty-five (45) minutes of reading enrichment in a group setting or assistance with homework.(e) Beginning September 1, 2027, and continuing each September 1 thereafter, a school entity that establishes a program under this section shall submit to the department a report for the prior school year. The report shall include the following data:(1) The number of students served.(2) The number of teen leaders employed and trained.20250HB1597PN1910 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Pre-assessment and post-assessment data on student reading proficiency.(4) Any partnership with a business, educational organization or other nonprofit organization assisting in the program.(5) Funding utilized.(f) A school entity may use Federal funds, State funds or private grants or gifts to implement a program under this section. State funds appropriated for the purpose of this section shall be prioritized for school entities with a high percentage of students in kindergarten through grade two who are not meeting grade-level reading benchmarks.(g) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Decoding strategy." A technique used to break down words into smaller parts such as phonemes or word families, prefixes and suffixes to help readers pronounce and understand unfamiliar words."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Evidence-based phonics curriculum." A curriculum designed and implemented based on research and data demonstrating the curriculum's effectiveness in teaching students to read and that involves systematic and explicit instruction in the relationships between sounds and letters."Leveled book." A book characterized and categorized by the level of difficulty of the text."Peer tutoring program." A program that provides paid work experience that affords the opportunity for a teen leader to 20250HB1597PN1910 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provide tutoring services to younger students in their own school entity community."Reading enrichment." Activity that connects reading to real-world issues and experiences to help students understand the relevance of what they are reading and make it more meaningful."School entity." A school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school."Structured literacy." The term shall have the same meaning as provided in section 1205.8(g)."Teen leader." A student in grade nine through twelve who is trained in a phonics-based leveled curriculum, data collection to measure reading level progress and behavior and classroom management.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1597PN1910 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516